Hawaii statutes.
§36-30 Special fund reimbursements for
departmental administrative expenses. (a) Each special fund, except the:

(1) Special out-of-school time instructional program
fund under section 302A-1310;

(2) School cafeteria special funds of the department
of education;

(3) Special funds of the University of Hawaii;

(4) [Repealed July 1, 2023. L 2013, c 157,
§9(1).] State educational facilities improvement special fund;

(5) Special funds established by section 206E-6;

(6) Aloha Tower fund created by section 206J-17;

(7) Funds of the employees' retirement system created
by section 88-109;

(8) Hawaii hurricane relief fund established under chapter
431P;

(9) Convention center enterprise special fund
established under section 201B-8;

(10) Hawaii health systems corporation special funds
and the subaccounts of its regional system boards;

(11) Tourism special fund established under section
201B-11;

(12) Universal service fund established under section
269-42;

(13) Emergency and budget reserve fund under section
328L-3;

(14) Public schools special fees and charges fund
under section 302A-1130;

(15) Sport fish special fund under section 187A-9.5;

[(16)] Neurotrauma special fund under section 321H-4;

[(17)] Center for nursing special fund under section
304A-2163;

[(18)] Passenger facility charge special fund
established by section 261-5.5;

[(19)] Court interpreting services revolving fund under
section 607-1.5;

[(20)] Trauma system special fund under section
321-22.5;

[(21)] Hawaii cancer research special fund;

[(22)] Community health centers special fund;

[(23)] Emergency medical services special fund;

[(24)] Rental motor vehicle customer facility charge
special fund established under section 261-5.6;

[(25)] Shared services technology special fund under
section 27-43;

[(26)] [Repealed December 31, 2017. L 2016, c 59, §§2,
3.] Nursing facility sustainability program special fund established
pursuant to [section 346F-4];

[(27)] Automated victim information and notification
system special fund established under section 353-136;

[(28)] [Repealed December 31, 2017. L 2016, c
60, §§3, 4.] Hospital sustainability program special fund under [section
346G-4]; and

[(29)] Civil monetary penalty special fund under section
321-30.2,

shall be responsible for its pro rata share of the
administrative expenses incurred by the department responsible for the
operations supported by the special fund concerned.

(b) Administrative expenses shall include:

(1) Salaries;

(2) Maintenance of buildings and grounds;

(3) Utilities;

(4) General office expenses; and

(5) Implementation of information technology policies
developed by the chief information officer and the information technology
steering committee pursuant to section 27-43.

(c) The pro rata share of each special fund
shall be that proportion of the administrative expenses of the department,
including those paid from all special funds administered by the department,
which the expenditures of the special fund bear to the total expenditures of
the department; provided that in determining the amount to be charged to each
special fund for its pro rata share:

(1) Credit shall be given for any administrative
expenses paid from the special fund concerned; and

(2) Other adjustments shall be made as necessary to
achieve an equitable apportionment.

(d) The director of finance may determine the
amount to be charged to each special fund and may cause the amounts to be
transferred to the general fund as reimbursements.

(e) No later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular session of the legislature, the director shall report
all departmental administrative expenses assessments made during the preceding
fiscal year. [L 1955, c 247, §2; RL 1955, §132-17; am L 1957, c 69, §1; am L
1963, c 193, §38; am L 1964, c 34, §1B; am L 1967, c 281, §3; HRS §36-30; am L
1969, c 269, §2; am L 1970, c 115, §2; am L 1976, c 123, §2; am L 1986, c 123,
§2; am L 1989, c 309, §4 and c 368, §5; am L 1993, c 280, §45; am L 1994, c
136, §2, c 137, §2, and c 232, §5; am L 1995, c 161, §6 and c 211, §§4, 17; am
L Sp 1995, c 11, §7; am L 1996, c 89, §4, c 123, §2, and c 262, §28; am L 1997,
c 123, §2, c 124, §4, and c 216, §§4, 13; am L 1998, c 115, §7 and c 156, §5;
am L 1999, c 98, §§3, 13(3), c 129, §§3, 22(1), (3), c 135, §§2, 7(1), c 155,
§§3, 7(1), c 163, §§9, 17, c 194, §1, and c 304, §§4, 10(1); am L 2000, c 205,
§4 and c 297, §24; am L 2001, c 163, §3, c 239, §4, and c 270, §5; am L 2002, c
39, §3, c 86, §2, c 160, §4, and c 253, §5; am L 2003, c 177, §3, c 179, §2, c
198, §5, and c 213, §15; am L 2004, c 101, §2; am L 2005, c 184, §3; am L 2006,
c 75, §4, c 305, §4, and c 316, §5; am L 2007, c 9, §3 and c 290, §8; am L
2008, c 226, §4; am L 2009, c 79, §28; am L 2009, c 79, §§28, 34(3); am L 2010,
c 200, §4; am L 2012, c 156, §§3, 5, c 190, §3, and c 217, §§3, 5; am L 2013, c
100, §3, c 141, §2, c 142, §3, and c 157, §4; am L 2014, c 123, §§2, 4 and c
124, §§2, 4, 7; am L 2015, c 69, §§2, 3, c 70, §§2, 3, 5, c 71, §3, and c 237, §5]

Note

L 2015, c 121 does not specifically amend this section but
§171-172(d), enacted by L 2015, c 121, §2, exempts the Turtle Bay conservation
easement special fund from the departmental administrative expenses of this
section.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next